Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6075.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 36-12-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-12 entitled "Insurance
Benefits" is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-12-7. Eligibility for benefits.
(a) All persons in the service of the state on and after July 1, 1960, whether elected,
appointed or employed, and private employees at nursing homes, developmental disability and
home care providers and employees with developmental disabilities whose salaries are ninety
percent (90%) funded with state or federal monies, who elect to participate in an insurance contract
or contracts shall be eligible to participate therein. The director, however, with the consent of the
insurance company or companies, may by rule or regulation exclude those classes of temporary,
part-time, or intermittent employees for whom insurance contracts shall be deemed to be
impracticable.
(b) The director, with the consent of the insurance company or companies, may authorize
the inclusion in insurance contracts of employees of public authorities, full-time employees of
organizations representing state employees, or other appropriate agencies of the state as may be
designated in the rules or regulations of the director, and may prescribe the rate of contribution
required from such participating authorities, or other agencies.
(c) Private employees listed in subsection (a) of this section who are eligible to opt into the
state healthcare plan shall have the insurance premium deducted from their earnings with the
private employer having the option to contribute to pay all or a portion of the premium payment.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001142
========
LC001142 - Page 2 of 3